Utah, session 2026, HB240.
Section 1. Section 53-7-204 is amended to read:53-7-204. Duties of Utah Fire Prevention Board -- Unified Code Analysis Council -- Local administrative duties.(1)The board shall:(a)administer the state fire code as the standard in the state;(b)subject to the state fire code, make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:(i)establishing standards for the prevention of fire and for the protection of life and property against fire and panic in any:(A)publicly owned building, including all public and private schools, colleges, and university buildings;(B)building or structure used or intended for use as an asylum, a mental hospital, a hospital, a sanitarium, a home for the elderly, an assisted living facility, a children's home or day care center, or any building or structure used for a similar purpose; or(C)place of assemblage where 50 or more persons may gather together in a building, structure, tent, or room for the purpose of amusement, entertainment, instruction, or education;(ii)establishing safety and other requirements for placement and discharge of display fireworks on the basis of:(A)the state fire code; and(B)relevant publications of the National Fire Protection Association;(iii)establishing safety standards for retail storage, handling, and sale of a division 1.4G common state approved explosive;(iv)defining methods to establish proof of competence to place and discharge display fireworks, special effects fireworks, and flame effects;(v)subject to Subsection (2), creating a uniform statewide policy regarding a state, county, special district, and local government entity's safe seizure, storage, and repurposing, destruction, or disposal of a division 1.1G explosive, division 1.2G explosive, division 1.3G explosive, or division 1.4G explosive that:(A)is illegal; or(B)a person uses or handles in an illegal manner;(vi)deputizing qualified persons to act as deputy fire marshals, and to secure special services in emergencies;(vii)implementing Section 15A-1-403;(viii)establishing criteria for the certification of firefighters, pump operators, instructors, fire officers, fire investigators, and rescue personnel not certified or licensed under any other section of the Utah Code;(ix)establishing criteria for training and safety equipment grants for fire departments enrolled in firefighter certification;(x)establishing ongoing training standards for hazardous materials emergency response agencies;(xi)establishing criteria for the fire safety inspection of a food truck; and(xii)establishing criteria for the accreditation and reaccreditation of fire service training organizations;(c)recommend to the commissioner a state fire marshal;(d)develop policies under which the state fire marshal and the state fire marshal's authorized representatives will perform;(e)provide for the employment of field assistants and other salaried personnel as required;(f)prescribe the duties of the state fire marshal and the state fire marshal's authorized representatives;(g)provide technical expertise, advice, and support to Utah Valley University in the establishment and operation of the fire and rescue training program described in Section 53H-4-705;(h)establish a statewide fire statistics program for the purpose of gathering fire data from all political subdivisions of the state;(i)coordinate the efforts of all people engaged in fire suppression in the state;(j)work aggressively with the local political subdivisions to reduce fire losses;(k)regulate the sale and servicing of portable fire extinguishers and automatic fire suppression systems in the interest of safeguarding lives and property;(l)establish a certification program for persons who inspect and test automatic fire sprinkler systems;(m)establish a certification program for persons who inspect and test fire alarm systems;(n)establish a certification for persons who provide response services regarding hazardous materials emergencies;(o)in accordance with Section 53-7-602, establish a licensing and certification program for carbon dioxide systems;(o)(p)in accordance with Sections 15A-1-403 and 68-3-14, submit a written report to the Business and Labor Interim Committee; and(p)(q)jointly create the Unified Code Analysis Council with the Uniform Building Code Commission in accordance with Section 15A-1-203.(2)(a)In the rules that the board makes under Subsection (1)(b)(v), the board shall include a provision prohibiting a state, county, special district, or local government entity from disposing of an item described in Subsection (1)(b)(v) by means of open burning, except under circumstances described in the rule.(b)When making a rule under Subsection (1)(b)(v), the board shall:(i)review and include applicable references to:(A)requirements described in Title 15A, Chapter 5, State Fire Code Act; and(B)provisions of the International Fire Code; and(ii)consider the appropriate role of the following in relation to the rule:(A)the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives; and(B)a firework wholesaler or distributor.(3)The board may incorporate in its rules by reference, in whole or in part:(a)the state fire code; or(b)subject to the state fire code, a nationally recognized and readily available standard pertaining to the protection of life and property from fire, explosion, or panic.(4)The following functions shall be administered locally by a city, county, or fire protection district:(a)issuing permits, including open burning permits pursuant to Sections 11-7-1 and 19-2-114;(b)creating a local board of appeals in accordance with the state fire code; and(c)subject to the state fire code and the other provisions of this chapter, establishing, modifying, or deleting fire flow and water supply requirements.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-7-601 is enacted to read:6. Carbon Dioxide System Licensing and Certification53-7-601. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)(a)"Carbon dioxide system" means a system that:(i)stores, uses, or dispenses carbon dioxide; and(ii)has a capacity of 100 pounds or more of carbon dioxide.(b)"Carbon dioxide system" includes:(i)an appliance used with a carbon dioxide system; and(ii)pipes, tubing, fittings, required signage, and gas detection, that are part of, or connect to, a carbon dioxide system.(2)"Service" means the inspection, installation, maintenance, repair, or modification of a carbon dioxide system.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53-7-602 is enacted to read:53-7-602. Carbon dioxide system licensing and certification required for certain activities -- Licensing and certification procedures.(1)On or after January 1, 2027, a person may not engage in the business of servicing a carbon dioxide system unless the person is currently licensed by the state fire marshal.(2)(a)On or after January 1, 2027, except as provided by Subsection (2)(b), an individual may not service a carbon dioxide system unless the individual is currently certified by the state fire marshal.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:(i)a fire officer; or(ii)an individual in training who:(A)has not worked for more than 45 business days as a trainee; and(B)is supervised by an individual who holds a current certification under Subsection (2)(a).(3)The board shall:(a)make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing requirements and standards for:(i)licensing under Subsection (1), including for initial licensing qualification, renewal, and revocation; and(ii)certification under Subsection (2), including for initial certification qualification, renewal, and revocation;(b)create application forms for licensing and certification; and(c)establish fees for licensing and certification under Section 63J-1-504.(4)An applicant for licensing under Subsection (1) or certification under Subsection (2) shall:(a)submit a written application on the form prescribed by the board;(b)provide evidence of competency as required by the board; and(c)submit the fee established under Subsection (3)(c).

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.